Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-735.06
Appointment of administrator; election of trustees; special election; when held.

Notwithstanding the appointment of an administrator for any district pursuant to sections 31-771 to 31-780, special elections shall be held for the election of members of the board of trustees for such district in the same manner and at the same time as such elections would be held under sections 31-735 to 31-735.03. In a district for which such an administrator has been appointed when the board of trustees of such district is not functioning, the administrator shall cause a special election of trustees to be held within sixty days after the issuance of a certificate of appointment of such administrator, at which election a board of trustees shall be elected to a term of office which shall expire on the first Tuesday of the second September following the appointment of such administrator. The board of trustees shall have five members unless the board has amended its articles of association to decrease the number of trustees on the board to three members pursuant to subdivision (2)(d) of section 31-735.

Laws 1982, LB 868, § 5;

Laws 2015, LB116, § 2.